Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 757.210 is amended to read:
757.210. (1)(a) Whenever any public utility files with  the Public Utility Commission any rate or
schedule of rates stating or establishing a new rate or schedule  of rates or increasing an existing
rate or schedule of rates,  the commission may, either upon written complaint or upon the
commission’s own initiative, after reasonable notice, conduct a hearing to determine whether the
rate or schedule is fair, just and reasonable. The commission shall  conduct the hearing upon written
complaint filed by the utility, its customer or customers, or any other proper party within 60  days
of the utility’s filing; provided that no hearing need be held  if the particular rate change is the re-
sult of an  automatic adjustment clause. At the hearing the utility shall bear the burden of showing
that the rate or schedule  of rates proposed to be established or increased or changed is fair, just
and reasonable. The commission may  not authorize a rate or schedule of rates that is not fair, just
and reasonable.
(b) As used in this subsection, “automatic adjustment clause” means a provision of a  rate
schedule that provides for rate increases or  decreases or both, without prior hearing, reflecting in-
creases or decreases or both in  costs incurred, taxes paid to units of government or revenues earned
by a utility and that is subject to review by the commission at least once every two years.
(2)(a) Subsection (1) of  this section does not apply to rate changes under an approved alternative
form of regulation plan, including a resource rate plan under ORS 757.212.
(b) Any alternative form of regulation plan  shall include provisions to ensure that the plan op-
erates in the interests of utility customers and the public  generally and results in rates that are just
and reasonable  and may include provisions establishing a reasonable range for rate of return on
investment. In approving a plan, the commission shall, at a minimum, consider whether the plan:
(A) Promotes increased efficiencies and cost control;
(B) Is consistent with least-cost resources acquisition policies;
(C) Yields rates that are consistent with those that would be obtained following application of
ORS 757.269;
(D) Is consistent with maintenance of safe, adequate and reliable service; and
(E) Is beneficial to utility customers generally, for example, by minimizing utility rates.
(c) As used  in this subsection, “alternative form of regulation plan” means a plan adopted by
the commission upon petition by a public utility, after  notice and an opportunity for a hearing, that
Enrolled House Bill 4025 (HB 4025-INTRO) Page 1
sets rates and revenues and a method for changes in rates and revenues using alternatives  to cost-
of-service rate regulation.
(d) Prior to  implementing a rate change under an alternative form of regulation plan, the utility
shall present a report that demonstrates the calculation of any proposed  rate change at a public
meeting of the commission.
(3) Except  as provided in ORS 757.212, the commission, at any time, may order a utility to ap-
pear and establish that any,  or all, of its rates in a plan authorized under subsection (2) of this
section are in conformity with the plan and are just and reasonable. Except as provided in ORS
757.212, such rates, and the alternative form of regulation  plan under which the rates are set, also
shall be subject to complaint under ORS 756.500.
(4) Periodically, but  not less often than every two years after the implementation of a plan re-
ferred to in subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall submit a  report to the Legislative
Assembly that shows the impact of the plan on rates paid by utility customers.
(5) The commission and staff may consult at any time  with, and provide technical assistance to,
utilities, their customers, and other interested parties on  matters relevant to utility rates and
charges. If a hearing is held  with respect to a rate change, the commission’s decisions shall be based
on the record made at the hearing.
(6) The commission may adjust rates  to mitigate an increase in residential customer rates if the
increase is of such magnitude that, if applied at the higher rate or all at one time, the  increase
would affect the ability of residential customers to  maintain adequate utility service. In considering
whether to adjust rates under this subsection, the commission:
(a) Must determine whether the proposed adjusted rates are fair, just and reasonable;
(b) May  not adjust rates in a manner that results in rates that are not fair, just and reasonable;
and
(c) Shall consider and may approve deferred accounting for future cost recovery from customers
for those amounts that are subject to rate mitigation.
(7) Any increase in the residential rates of a public utility that provides electricity or na-
tural gas services  may not take effect from November 1 to March 31.
SECTION 2.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4025 (HB 4025-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4025 (HB 4025-INTRO) Page 3